Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.171

Remedies for breach of limited liability company agreement by manager.

A limited liability company agreement may provide that (1) a manager who fails to perform in accordance with, or to comply with the terms and conditions of, the limited liability company agreement is subject to specified penalties or specified consequences, and (2) at the time or upon the happening of events specified in the limited liability company agreement, a manager is subject to specified penalties or specified consequences.

[ 2015 c 188 s 36.]